Washington statutes.
RCW 16.08.010

Liability for injury to stock by dogs.

The owner or keeper of any dog shall be liable to the owner of any animal killed or injured by such dog for the amount of damages sustained and costs of collection, to be recovered in a civil action.

[ 1985 c 415 s 14; 1929 c 198 s 5; RRS s 3106. Prior: 1919 c 6 s 5; RCS s 3106.]